Massachusetts, session 194th, S1585.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 201D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the first paragraph the following
sentence: - "An agent shall also have the authority to access a principal’s confidential medical
records up to six months after the death of the principal unless a personal representative
represents the estate of the principal."
; and by inserting after the third paragraph the following:-
"The agent shall also have the right to receive any and all medical information, including
any and all confidential medical information that the principal would be entitled to receive, up to
six months after the death of the principal unless a personal representative represents the estate
of the principal."
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 201D is hereby amended, in line 1, by inserting
after the word “begin” the following words:- "either upon the death of the principal or"
SECTION 3. Section 7 of said chapter 201D is hereby amended by striking out the third
paragraph in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- "A health care
proxy shall also be revoked upon: (i) execution by the principal of a subsequent health care
proxy; (ii) the divorce or legal separation of the principal and his spouse, where the spouse is the
principal’s agent under a health care proxy; (iii) the expiration of six months after the death of
the principal; or (iv) the appointment or assumption of representation of the principal’s estate by
a personal representative."
SECTION 4. Section 17 of said chapter 201D is hereby amended, in line 2, by inserting
after the word “principal” the following words:- ", the personal representative of the principal’s
estate"
of 2